Massachusetts, session 194th, S1150.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 26C of chapter 265 of the General Laws, as amended by Chapter 267 of the Acts
of 2016, is hereby amended by inserting after the existing subsection (b), a new subsection (c) as
follows:-
(c) No person, by any means and without privilege to do so, shall knowingly entice any
child under the age of 16, or someone he believes to be a child under the age of 16, to enter into
any vehicle, if:
(1) The person does not have the express or implied permission of the parent, guardian,
or other legal custodian of the child in undertaking the activity; and
(2) (i) The person is not a law enforcement officer, emergency services provider as
defined in section 71-507, firefighter, or other person who regularly provides emergency
of 2

services, is not the operator of a bookmobile or other such vehicle operated by the state or a
political subdivision and used for informing, educating, organizing, or transporting children, is
not a paid employee of, or a volunteer for, a nonprofit or religious organization which provides
activities for children, and is not an employee or agent of or a volunteer acting under the
direction of any board of education or (ii) the person is a person listed in subdivision (c)(2)(i) of
this section but, at the time the person undertakes the activity, he or she is not acting within the
scope of his or her lawful duties in that capacity.
(3) It is an affirmative defense to a charge under this subsection (c) that the person
undertook the activity in response to a bona fide emergency situation or that the person
undertook the activity in response to a reasonable belief that it was necessary to preserve the
health, safety, or welfare of the child.
(4) Any person who violates this subsection (c) shall be punished by imprisonment in the
state prison for not more than 5 years, or in the house of correction for not more than 2 1/2 years,
or by both imprisonment and a fine of not more than $5,000.
of 2